Hawaii statutes.
§602-3 Absence, disability, etc., of chief
justice. Wherever, by the provisions of any law of the State, any act is
required to be performed by the chief justice of the supreme court, the act may
(unless otherwise expressly provided) be performed, in case of a vacancy in the
office of chief justice, or if the chief justice is ill, absent, or otherwise
unable to serve, by an associate justice of the court designated in accordance
with the rules of the supreme court. [L 1892, c 72, §4; RL 1925, §2222; RL 1935,
§3591; RL 1945, §9602; RL 1955, §214-2; am L Sp 1959 1st, c 5, §2(b); HRS
§602-3; am L 1972, c 88, §2(a); ree L 1979, c 111, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

See Const. art. VI, §2.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next